Hawaii statutes.
§291-51.4
Fraudulent verification of an applicant as a person with a disability; penalty.
A physician or advanced practice registered nurse who fraudulently verifies that an applicant is a
person with a disability to enable the person to represent to the issuing
agency that the person is qualified to obtain a removable windshield placard,
temporary removable windshield placard, or special license plates shall be
guilty of a petty misdemeanor. Each fraudulent verification shall constitute a
separate offense. [L 2001, c 297, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 45, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next